ro-RO: Mărimile încălțămintei pentru femei din Regatul Unit: 10; 10 Extra lat; 10 Mediu; 10 Îngust; 10 Standard; 10 Lat; 2; 2 Extra lat; 2 Mediu; 2 Îngust; 2 Standard; 2 Lat; 2,5; 2,5 Extra lat; 2,5 Mediu; 2,5 Îngust; 2,5 Standard; 2,5 Lat; 3; 3 Extra lat; 3 Mediu; 3 Îngust; 3 Standard; 3 Lat; 3,5; 3,5 Extra lat; 3,5 Mediu; 3,5 Îngust; 3,5 Standard; 3,5 Lat; 4; 4 Extra lat; 4 Mediu; 4 Îngust; 4 Standard; 4 Lat; 4,5; 4,5 Extra lat; 4,5 Mediu; 4,5 Îngust; 4,5 Standard; 4,5 Lat; 5; 5 Extra lat; 5 Mediu; 5 Îngust; 5 Standard; 5 Lat; 5,5; 5,5 Extra lat; 5,5 Mediu; 5,5 Îngust; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Lat; 6; 6 Extra lat; 6 Mediu; 6 Îngust; 6 Standard; 6 Lat; 6,5; 6,5 Extra lat; 6,5 Mediu; 6,5 Îngust; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Lat; 7; 7 Extra lat; 7 Mediu; 7 Îngust; 7 Standard; 7 Lat; 7,5; 7,5 Extra lat; 7,5 Mediu; 7,5 Îngust; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Lat; 8; 8 Extra lat; 8 Mediu; 8 Îngust; 8 Standard; 8 Lat; 8,5; 8,5 Extra lat; 8,5 Mediu; 8,5 Îngust; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Lat; 9; 9 Extra lat; 9 Mediu; 9 Îngust; 9 Standard; 9 Lat; 9,5; 9,5 Extra lat; 9,5 Mediu; 9,5 Îngust; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Lat; Altele
de: Britische Damenschuhgröße: 10; 10 Extraweit; 10 Mittel; 10 Schmal; 10 Standard; 10 Weit; 2; 2 Extraweit; 2 Mittel; 2 Schmal; 2 Standard; 2 Weit; 2,5; 2,5 Extraweit; 2,5 Mittel; 2,5 Schmal; 2,5 Standard; 2,5 Weit; 3; 3 Extraweit; 3 Mittel; 3 Schmal; 3 Standard; 3 Weit; 3,5; 3,5 Extraweit; 3,5 Mittel; 3,5 Schmal; 3,5 Standard; 3,5 Weit; 4; 4 Extraweit; 4 Mittel; 4 Schmal; 4 Standard; 4 Weit; 4,5; 4,5 Extraweit; 4,5 Mittel; 4,5 Schmal; 4,5 Standard; 4,5 Weit; 5; 5 Extraweit; 5 Mittel; 5 Schmal; 5 Standard; 5 Weit; 5,5; 5,5 Extraweit; 5,5 Mittel; 5,5 Schmal; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Weit; 6; 6 Extraweit; 6 Mittel; 6 Schmal; 6 Standard; 6 Weit; 6,5; 6,5 Extraweit; 6,5 Mittel; 6,5 Schmal; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Weit; 7; 7 Extraweit; 7 Mittel; 7 Schmal; 7 Standard; 7 Weit; 7,5; 7,5 Extraweit; 7,5 Mittel; 7,5 Schmal; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Weit; 8; 8 Extraweit; 8 Mittel; 8 Schmal; 8 Standard; 8 Weit; 8,5; 8,5 Extraweit; 8,5 Mittel; 8,5 Schmal; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Weit; 9; 9 Extraweit; 9 Mittel; 9 Schmal; 9 Standard; 9 Weit; 9,5; 9,5 Extraweit; 9,5 Mittel; 9,5 Schmal; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Weit; Andere
sv: Storbritanniens damskostorlek: 10; 10 extra bred; 10 medium; 10 smal; 10 standard; 10 bred; 2; 2 extra bred; 2 medium; 2 smal; 2 standard; 2 bred; 2,5; 2,5 extra bred; 2,5 medium; 2,5 smal; 2,5 standard; 2,5 bred; 3; 3 extra bred; 3 medium; 3 smal; 3 standard; 3 bred; 3,5; 3,5 extra bred; 3,5 medium; 3,5 smal; 3,5 standard; 3,5 bred; 4; 4 extra bred; 4 medium; 4 smal; 4 standard; 4 bred; 4,5; 4,5 extra bred; 4,5 medium; 4,5 smal; 4,5 standard; 4,5 bred; 5; 5 extra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 extra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 extra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 extra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 extra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 extra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 extra bred; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standard; 8 bred; 8,5; 8,5 extra bred; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standard; 8,5 bred; 9; 9 extra bred; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standard; 9 bred; 9,5; 9,5 extra bred; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standard; 9,5 bred; Övrigt
hu: Angol női cipőméret: 10; 10 Extra széles; 10 Közepes; 10 Keskeny; 10 Normál; 10 Széles; 2; 2 Extra széles; 2 Közepes; 2 Keskeny; 2 Normál; 2 Széles; 2,5; 2,5 Extra széles; 2,5 Közepes; 2,5 Keskeny; 2,5 Normál; 2,5 Széles; 3; 3 Extra széles; 3 Közepes; 3 Keskeny; 3 Normál; 3 Széles; 3,5; 3,5 Extra széles; 3,5 Közepes; 3,5 Keskeny; 3,5 Normál; 3,5 Széles; 4; 4 Extra széles; 4 Közepes; 4 Keskeny; 4 Normál; 4 Széles; 4,5; 4,5 Extra széles; 4,5 Közepes; 4,5 Keskeny; 4,5 Normál; 4,5 Széles; 5; 5 Extra széles; 5 Közepes; 5 Keskeny; 5 Normál; 5 Széles; 5,5; 5,5 Extra széles; 5,5 Közepes; 5,5 Keskeny; 5,5 Normál; 5,5 Széles; 6; 6 Extra széles; 6 Közepes; 6 Keskeny; 6 Normál; 6 Széles; 6,5; 6,5 Extra széles; 6,5 Közepes; 6,5 Keskeny; 6,5 Normál; 6,5 Széles; 7; 7 Extra széles; 7 Közepes; 7 Keskeny; 7 Normál; 7 Széles; 7,5; 7,5 Extra széles; 7,5 Közepes; 7,5 Keskeny; 7,5 Normál; 7,5 Széles; 8; 8 Extra széles; 8 Közepes; 8 Keskeny; 8 Normál; 8 Széles; 8,5; 8,5 Extra széles; 8,5 Közepes; 8,5 Keskeny; 8,5 Normál; 8,5 Széles; 9; 9 Extra széles; 9 Közepes; 9 Keskeny; 9 Normál; 9 Széles; 9,5; 9,5 Extra széles; 9,5 Közepes; 9,5 Keskeny; 9,5 Normál; 9,5 Széles; Egyéb
es: Número de zapato de mujer del Reino Unido: 10; 10 extra ancho; 10 mediano; 10 estrecho; 10 estándar; 10 ancho; 2; 2 extra ancho; 2 mediano; 2 estrecho; 2 estándar; 2 ancho; 2,5; 2,5 extra ancho; 2,5 mediano; 2,5 estrecho; 2,5 estándar; 2,5 ancho; 3; 3 extra ancho; 3 mediano; 3 estrecho; 3 estándar; 3 ancho; 3,5; 3,5 extra ancho; 3,5 mediano; 3,5 estrecho; 3,5 estándar; 3,5 ancho; 4; 4 extra ancho; 4 mediano; 4 estrecho; 4 estándar; 4 ancho; 4,5; 4,5 extra ancho; 4,5 mediano; 4,5 estrecho; 4,5 estándar; 4,5 ancho; 5; 5 extra ancho; 5 mediano; 5 estrecho; 5 estándar; 5 ancho; 5,5; 5,5 extra ancho; 5,5 mediano; 5,5 estrecho; 5,5 estándar; 5,5 ancho; 6; 6 extra ancho; 6 mediano; 6 estrecho; 6 estándar; 6 ancho; 6,5; 6,5 extra ancho; 6,5 mediano; 6,5 estrecho; 6,5 estándar; 6,5 ancho; 7; 7 extra ancho; 7 mediano; 7 estrecho; 7 estándar; 7 ancho; 7,5; 7,5 extra ancho; 7,5 mediano; 7,5 estrecho; 7,5 estándar; 7,5 ancho; 8; 8 extra ancho; 8 mediano; 8 estrecho; 8 estándar; 8 ancho; 8,5; 8,5 extra ancho; 8,5 mediano; 8,5 estrecho; 8,5 estándar; 8,5 ancho; 9; 9 extra ancho; 9 mediano; 9 estrecho; 9 estándar; 9 ancho; 9,5; 9,5 extra ancho; 9,5 mediano; 9,5 estrecho; 9,5 estándar; 9,5 ancho; Otro
th: ขนาดรองเท้าผู้หญิงแบบอังกฤษ: 10; 10 กว้างพิเศษ; 10 ปานกลาง; 10 แคบ; 10 มาตรฐาน; 10 กว้าง; 2; 2 กว้างพิเศษ; 2 ปานกลาง; 2 แคบ; 2 มาตรฐาน; 2 กว้าง; 2.5; 2.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 2.5 ปานกลาง; 2.5 แคบ; 2.5 มาตรฐาน; 2.5 กว้าง; 3; 3 กว้างพิเศษ; 3 ปานกลาง; 3 แคบ; 3 มาตรฐาน; 3 กว้าง; 3.5; 3.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 3.5 ปานกลาง; 3.5 แคบ; 3.5 มาตรฐาน; 3.5 กว้าง; 4; 4 กว้างพิเศษ; 4 ปานกลาง; 4 แคบ; 4 มาตรฐาน; 4 กว้าง; 4.5; 4.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 4.5 ปานกลาง; 4.5 แคบ; 4.5 มาตรฐาน; 4.5 กว้าง; 5; 5 กว้างพิเศษ; 5 ปานกลาง; 5 แคบ; 5 มาตรฐาน; 5 กว้าง; 5.5; 5.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 5.5 ปานกลาง; 5.5 แคบ; 5.5 มาตรฐาน; 5.5 กว้าง; 6; 6 กว้างพิเศษ; 6 ปานกลาง; 6 แคบ; 6 มาตรฐาน; 6 กว้าง; 6.5; 6.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 6.5 ปานกลาง; 6.5 แคบ; 6.5 มาตรฐาน; 6.5 กว้าง; 7; 7 กว้างพิเศษ; 7 ปานกลาง; 7 แคบ; 7 มาตรฐาน; 7 กว้าง; 7.5; 7.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 7.5 ปานกลาง; 7.5 แคบ; 7.5 มาตรฐาน; 7.5 กว้าง; 8; 8 กว้างพิเศษ; 8 ปานกลาง; 8 แคบ; 8 มาตรฐาน; 8 กว้าง; 8.5; 8.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 8.5 ปานกลาง; 8.5 แคบ; 8.5 มาตรฐาน; 8.5 กว้าง; 9; 9 กว้างพิเศษ; 9 ปานกลาง; 9 แคบ; 9 มาตรฐาน; 9 กว้าง; 9.5; 9.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 9.5 ปานกลาง; 9.5 แคบ; 9.5 มาตรฐาน; 9.5 กว้าง; อื่นๆ
ru: Размер женской обуви UK: 10; 10, очень широкий; 10, средний; 10, узкий; 10, стандартный; 10, широкий; 2; 2, очень широкий; 2, средний; 2, узкий; 2, стандартный; 2, широкий; 2,5; 2,5, очень широкий; 2,5, средний; 2,5, узкий; 2,5, стандартный; 2,5, широкий; 3; 3, очень широкий; 3, средний; 3, узкий; 3, стандартный; 3, широкий; 3,5; 3,5, очень широкий; 3,5, средний; 3,5, узкий; 3,5, стандартный; 3,5, широкий; 4; 4, очень широкий; 4, средний; 4, узкий; 4, стандартный; 4, широкий; 4,5; 4,5, очень широкий; 4,5, средний; 4,5, узкий; 4,5, стандартный; 4,5, широкий; 5; 5, очень широкий; 5, средний; 5, узкий; 5, стандартный; 5, широкий; 5,5; 5,5, очень широкий; 5,5, средний; 5,5, узкий; 5,5, стандартный; 5,5, широкий; 6; 6, очень широкий; 6, средний; 6, узкий; 6, стандартный; 6, широкий; 6,5; 6,5, очень широкий; 6,5, средний; 6,5, узкий; 6,5, стандартный; 6,5, широкий; 7; 7, очень широкий; 7, средний; 7, узкий; 7, стандартный; 7, широкий; 7,5; 7,5, очень широкий; 7,5, средний; 7,5, узкий; 7,5, стандартный; 7,5, широкий; 8; 8, очень широкий; 8, средний; 8, узкий; 8, стандартный; 8, широкий; 8,5; 8,5, очень широкий; 8,5, средний; 8,5, узкий; 8,5, стандартный; 8,5, широкий; 9; 9, очень широкий; 9, средний; 9, узкий; 9, стандартный; 9, широкий; 9,5; 9,5, очень широкий; 9,5, средний; 9,5, узкий; 9,5, стандартный; 9,5, широкий; Другое
vi: Kích thước giày nữ Anh: 10; 10 cực rộng; 10 trung bình; 10 hẹp; 10 tiêu chuẩn; 10 rộng; 2; 2 cực rộng; 2 trung bình; 2 hẹp; 2 tiêu chuẩn; 2 rộng; 2.5; 2.5 cực rộng; 2.5 trung bình; 2.5 hẹp; 2.5 tiêu chuẩn; 2.5 rộng; 3; 3 cực rộng; 3 trung bình; 3 hẹp; 3 tiêu chuẩn; 3 rộng; 3.5; 3.5 cực rộng; 3.5 trung bình; 3.5 hẹp; 3.5 tiêu chuẩn; 3.5 rộng; 4; 4 cực rộng; 4 trung bình; 4 hẹp; 4 tiêu chuẩn; 4 rộng; 4.5; 4.5 cực rộng; 4.5 trung bình; 4.5 hẹp; 4.5 tiêu chuẩn; 4.5 rộng; 5; 5 cực rộng; 5 trung bình; 5 hẹp; 5 tiêu chuẩn; 5 rộng; 5.5; 5.5 cực rộng; 5.5 trung bình; 5.5 hẹp; 5.5 tiêu chuẩn; 5.5 rộng; 6; 6 cực rộng; 6 trung bình; 6 hẹp; 6 tiêu chuẩn; 6 rộng; 6.5; 6.5 cực rộng; 6.5 trung bình; 6.5 hẹp; 6.5 tiêu chuẩn; 6.5 rộng; 7; 7 cực rộng; 7 trung bình; 7 hẹp; 7 tiêu chuẩn; 7 rộng; 7.5; 7.5 cực rộng; 7.5 trung bình; 7.5 hẹp; 7.5 tiêu chuẩn; 7.5 rộng; 8; 8 cực rộng; 8 trung bình; 8 hẹp; 8 tiêu chuẩn; 8 rộng; 8.5; 8.5 cực rộng; 8.5 trung bình; 8.5 hẹp; 8.5 tiêu chuẩn; 8.5 rộng; 9; 9 cực rộng; 9 trung bình; 9 hẹp; 9 tiêu chuẩn; 9 rộng; 9.5; 9.5 cực rộng; 9.5 trung bình; 9.5 hẹp; 9.5 tiêu chuẩn; 9.5 rộng; Khác
fi: Brittiläinen naisten kenkäkoko: 10; 10 erittäin leveä; 10 normaali; 10 kapea; 10 vakio; 10 leveä; 2; 2 erittäin leveä; 2 normaali; 2 kapea; 2 vakio; 2 leveä; 2,5; 2,5 erittäin leveä; 2,5 normaali; 2,5 kapea; 2,5 vakio; 2,5 leveä; 3; 3 erittäin leveä; 3 normaali; 3 kapea; 3 vakio; 3 leveä; 3,5; 3,5 erittäin leveä; 3,5 normaali; 3,5 kapea; 3,5 vakio; 3,5 leveä; 4; 4 erittäin leveä; 4 normaali; 4 kapea; 4 vakio; 4 leveä; 4,5; 4,5 erittäin leveä; 4,5 normaali; 4,5 kapea; 4,5 vakio; 4,5 leveä; 5; 5 erittäin leveä; 5 normaali; 5 kapea; 5 vakio; 5 leveä; 5,5; 5,5 erittäin leveä; 5,5 normaali; 5,5 kapea; 5,5 vakio; 5,5 leveä; 6; 6 erittäin leveä; 6 normaali; 6 kapea; 6 vakio; 6 leveä; 6,5; 6,5 erittäin leveä; 6,5 normaali; 6,5 kapea; 6,5 vakio; 6,5 leveä; 7; 7 erittäin leveä; 7 normaali; 7 kapea; 7 vakio; 7 leveä; 7,5; 7,5 erittäin leveä; 7,5 normaali; 7,5 kapea; 7,5 vakio; 7,5 leveä; 8; 8 erittäin leveä; 8 normaali; 8 kapea; 8 vakio; 8 leveä; 8,5; 8,5 erittäin leveä; 8,5 normaali; 8,5 kapea; 8,5 vakio; 8,5 leveä; 9; 9 erittäin leveä; 9 normaali; 9 kapea; 9 vakio; 9 leveä; 9,5; 9,5 erittäin leveä; 9,5 normaali; 9,5 kapea; 9,5 vakio; 9,5 leveä; Muu
sk-SK: Veľkosť dámskej obuvi vo Veľkej Británii: 10; 10 extra široká; 10 stredná; 10 úzka; 10 štandardná; 10 široká; 2; 2 extra široká; 2 stredná; 2 úzka; 2 štandardná; 2 široká; 2,5; 2,5 extra široká; 2,5 stredná; 2,5 úzka; 2,5 štandardná; 2,5 široká; 3; 3 extra široká; 3 stredná; 3 úzka; 3 štandardná; 3 široká; 3,5; 3,5 extra široká; 3,5 stredná; 3,5 úzka; 3,5 štandardná; 3,5 široká; 4; 4 extra široká; 4 stredná; 4 úzka; 4 štandardná; 4 široká; 4,5; 4,5 extra široká; 4,5 stredná; 4,5 úzka; 4,5 štandardná; 4,5 široká; 5; 5 extra široká; 5 stredná; 5 úzka; 5 štandardná; 5 široká; 5,5; 5,5 extra široká; 5,5 stredná; 5,5 úzka; 5,5 štandardná; 5,5 široká; 6; 6 extra široká; 6 stredná; 6 úzka; 6 štandardná; 6 široká; 6,5; 6,5 extra široká; 6,5 stredná; 6,5 úzka; 6,5 štandardná; 6,5 široká; 7; 7 extra široká; 7 stredná; 7 úzka; 7 štandardná; 7 široká; 7,5; 7,5 extra široká; 7,5 stredná; 7,5 úzka; 7,5 štandardná; 7,5 široká; 8; 8 extra široká; 8 stredná; 8 úzka; 8 štandardná; 8 široká; 8,5; 8,5 extra široká; 8,5 stredná; 8,5 úzka; 8,5 štandardná; 8,5 široká; 9; 9 extra široká; 9 stredná; 9 úzka; 9 štandardná; 9 široká; 9,5; 9,5 extra široká; 9,5 stredná; 9,5 úzka; 9,5 štandardná; 9,5 široká; Iné
pt-BR: Calçado feminino UK tamanho: 10; 10 Extralargo; 10 Médio; 10 Estreito; 10 Padrão; 10 Largo; 2; 2 Extralargo; 2 Médio; 2 Estreito; 2 Padrão; 2 Largo; 2,5; 2,5 Extralargo; 2,5 Médio; 2,5 Estreito; 2,5 Padrão; 2,5 Largo; 3; 3 Extralargo; 3 Médio; 3 Estreito; 3 Padrão; 3 Largo; 3,5; 3,5 Extralargo; 3,5 Médio; 3,5 Estreito; 3,5 Padrão; 3,5 Largo; 4; 4 Extralargo; 4 Médio; 4 Estreito; 4 Padrão; 4 Largo; 4,5; 4,5 Extralargo; 4,5 Médio; 4,5 Estreito; 4,5 Padrão; 4,5 Largo; 5; 5 Extralargo; 5 Médio; 5 Estreito; 5 Padrão; 5 Largo; 5,5; 5,5 Extralargo; 5,5 Médio; 5,5 Estreito; 5,5 Padrão; 5,5 Largo; 6; 6 Extralargo; 6 Médio; 6 Estreito; 6 Padrão; 6 Largo; 6,5; 6,5 Extralargo; 6,5 Médio; 6,5 Estreito; 6,5 Padrão; 6,5 Largo; 7; 7 Extralargo; 7 Médio; 7 Estreito; 7 Padrão; 7 Largo; 7,5; 7,5 Extralargo; 7,5 Médio; 7,5 Estreito; 7,5 Padrão; 7,5 Largo; 8; 8 Extralargo; 8 Médio; 8 Estreito; 8 Padrão; 8 Largo; 8,5; 8,5 Extralargo; 8,5 Médio; 8,5 Estreito; 8,5 Padrão; 8,5 Largo; 9; 9 Extralargo; 9 Médio; 9 Estreito; 9 Padrão; 9 Largo; 9,5; 9,5 Extralargo; 9,5 Médio; 9,5 Estreito; 9,5 Padrão; 9,5 Largo; Outro
hr-HR: Veličina ženskih cipela u Ujedinjenom Kraljevstvu: 10; 10 iznimno široko; 10 srednje; 10 usko; 10 standardno; 10 široko; 2; 2 iznimno široko; 2 srednje; 2 usko; 2 standardno; 2 široko; 2,5; 2,5 iznimno široko; 2,5 srednje; 2,5 usko; 2,5 standardno; 2,5 široko; 3; 3 iznimno široko; 3 srednje; 3 usko; 3 standardno; 3 široko; 3,5; 3,5 iznimno široko; 3,5 srednje; 3,5 usko; 3,5 standardno; 3,5 široko; 4; 4 iznimno široko; 4 srednje; 4 usko; 4 standardno; 4 široko; 4,5; 4,5 iznimno široko; 4,5 srednje; 4,5 usko; 4,5 standardno; 4,5 široko; 5; 5 iznimno široko; 5 srednje; 5 usko; 5 standardno; 5 široko; 5,5; 5,5 iznimno široko; 5,5 srednje; 5,5 usko; 5,5 standardno; 5,5 široko; 6; 6 iznimno široko; 6 srednje; 6 usko; 6 standardno; 6 široko; 6,5; 6,5 iznimno široko; 6,5 srednje; 6,5 usko; 6,5 standardno; 6,5 široko; 7; 7 iznimno široko; 7 srednje; 7 usko; 7 standardno; 7 široko; 7,5; 7,5 iznimno široko; 7,5 srednje; 7,5 usko; 7,5 standardno; 7,5 široko; 8; 8 iznimno široko; 8 srednje; 8 usko; 8 standardno; 8 široko; 8,5; 8,5 iznimno široko; 8,5 srednje; 8,5 usko; 8,5 standardno; 8,5 široko; 9; 9 iznimno široko; 9 srednje; 9 usko; 9 standardno; 9 široko; 9,5; 9,5 iznimno široko; 9,5 srednje; 9,5 usko; 9,5 standardno; 9,5 široko; Ostalo
el: Βρετανικό μέγεθος γυναικείων παπουτσιών: 10; 10 Πολύ φαρδύ; 10 Μεσαίο; 10 Στενό; 10 Κανονικό; 10 Φαρδύ; 2; 2 Πολύ φαρδύ; 2 Μεσαίο; 2 Στενό; 2 Κανονικό; 2 Φαρδύ; 2,5; 2,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 2,5 Μεσαίο; 2,5 Στενό; 2,5 Κανονικό; 2,5 Φαρδύ; 3; 3 Πολύ φαρδύ; 3 Μεσαίο; 3 Στενό; 3 Κανονικό; 3 Φαρδύ; 3,5; 3,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 3,5 Μεσαίο; 3,5 Στενό; 3,5 Κανονικό; 3,5 Φαρδύ; 4; 4 Πολύ φαρδύ; 4 Μεσαίο; 4 Στενό; 4 Κανονικό; 4 Φαρδύ; 4,5; 4,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 4,5 Μεσαίο; 4,5 Στενό; 4,5 Κανονικό; 4,5 Φαρδύ; 5; 5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 5 Μεσαίο; 5 Στενό; 5 Κανονικό; 5 Φαρδύ; 5,5; 5,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 5,5 Μεσαίο; 5,5 Στενό; 5,5 Κανονικό; 5,5 Φαρδύ; 6; 6 Πολύ φαρδύ; 6 Μεσαίο; 6 Στενό; 6 Κανονικό; 6 Φαρδύ; 6,5; 6,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 6,5 Μεσαίο; 6,5 Στενό; 6,5 Κανονικό; 6,5 Φαρδύ; 7; 7 Πολύ φαρδύ; 7 Μεσαίο; 7 Στενό; 7 Κανονικό; 7 Φαρδύ; 7,5; 7,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 7,5 Μεσαίο; 7,5 Στενό; 7,5 Κανονικό; 7,5 Φαρδύ; 8; 8 Πολύ φαρδύ; 8 Μεσαίο; 8 Στενό; 8 Κανονικό; 8 Φαρδύ; 8,5; 8,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 8,5 Μεσαίο; 8,5 Στενό; 8,5 Κανονικό; 8,5 Φαρδύ; 9; 9 Πολύ φαρδύ; 9 Μεσαίο; 9 Στενό; 9 Κανονικό; 9 Φαρδύ; 9,5; 9,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 9,5 Μεσαίο; 9,5 Στενό; 9,5 Κανονικό; 9,5 Φαρδύ; Άλλο
pl: Brytyjski rozmiar butów damskich: 10; 10 bardzo szerokie; 10 średnie; 10 wąskie; 10 standardowe; 10 szerokie; 2; 2 bardzo szerokie; 2 średnie; 2 wąskie; 2 standardowe; 2 szerokie; 2,5; 2,5 bardzo szerokie; 2,5 średnie; 2,5 wąskie; 2,5 standardowe; 2,5 szerokie; 3; 3 bardzo szerokie; 3 średnie; 3 wąskie; 3 standardowe; 3 szerokie; 3,5; 3,5 bardzo szerokie; 3,5 średnie; 3,5 wąskie; 3,5 standardowe; 3,5 szerokie; 4; 4 bardzo szerokie; 4 średnie; 4 wąskie; 4 standardowe; 4 szerokie; 4,5; 4,5 bardzo szerokie; 4,5 średnie; 4,5 wąskie; 4,5 standardowe; 4,5 szerokie; 5; 5 bardzo szerokie; 5 średnie; 5 wąskie; 5 standardowe; 5 szerokie; 5,5; 5,5 bardzo szerokie; 5,5 średnie; 5,5 wąskie; 5,5 standardowe; 5,5 szerokie; 6; 6 bardzo szerokie; 6 średnie; 6 wąskie; 6 standardowe; 6 szerokie; 6,5; 6,5 bardzo szerokie; 6,5 średnie; 6,5 wąskie; 6,5 standardowe; 6,5 szerokie; 7; 7 bardzo szerokie; 7 średnie; 7 wąskie; 7 standardowe; 7 szerokie; 7,5; 7,5 bardzo szerokie; 7,5 średnie; 7,5 wąskie; 7,5 standardowe; 7,5 szerokie; 8; 8 bardzo szerokie; 8 średnie; 8 wąskie; 8 standardowe; 8 szerokie; 8,5; 8,5 bardzo szerokie; 8,5 średnie; 8,5 wąskie; 8,5 standardowe; 8,5 szerokie; 9; 9 bardzo szerokie; 9 średnie; 9 wąskie; 9 standardowe; 9 szerokie; 9,5; 9,5 bardzo szerokie; 9,5 średnie; 9,5 wąskie; 9,5 standardowe; 9,5 szerokie; Inne
pt-PT: Tamanho de calçado feminino do Reino Unido: 10; 10 Extra largo; 10 Médio; 10 Estreito; 10 Standard; 10 Largo; 2; 2 Extra largo; 2 Médio; 2 Estreito; 2 Standard; 2 Largo; 2,5; 2,5 Extra largo; 2,5 Médio; 2,5 Estreito; 2,5 Standard; 2,5 Largo; 3; 3 Extra largo; 3 Médio; 3 Estreito; 3 Standard; 3 Largo; 3,5; 3,5 Extra largo; 3,5 Médio; 3,5 Estreito; 3,5 Standard; 3,5 Largo; 4; 4 Extra largo; 4 Médio; 4 Estreito; 4 Standard; 4 Largo; 4,5; 4,5 Extra largo; 4,5 Médio; 4,5 Estreito; 4,5 Standard; 4,5 Largo; 5; 5 Extra largo; 5 Médio; 5 Estreito; 5 Standard; 5 Largo; 5,5; 5,5 Extra largo; 5,5 Médio; 5,5 Estreito; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Largo; 6; 6 Extra largo; 6 Médio; 6 Estreito; 6 Standard; 6 Largo; 6,5; 6,5 Extra largo; 6,5 Médio; 6,5 Estreito; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Largo; 7; 7 Extra largo; 7 Médio; 7 Estreito; 7 Standard; 7 Largo; 7,5; 7,5 Extra largo; 7,5 Médio; 7,5 Estreito; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Largo; 8; 8 Extra largo; 8 Médio; 8 Estreito; 8 Standard; 8 Largo; 8,5; 8,5 Extra largo; 8,5 Médio; 8,5 Estreito; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Largo; 9; 9 Extra largo; 9 Médio; 9 Estreito; 9 Standard; 9 Largo; 9,5; 9,5 Extra largo; 9,5 Médio; 9,5 Estreito; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Largo; Outro
da: Britisk skostørrelse for kvinder: 10; 10 ekstra bred; 10 medium; 10 smal; 10 standard; 10 bred; 2; 2 ekstra bred; 2 medium; 2 smal; 2 standard; 2 bred; 2,5; 2,5 ekstra bred; 2,5 medium; 2,5 smal; 2,5 standard; 2,5 bred; 3; 3 ekstra bred; 3 medium; 3 smal; 3 standard; 3 bred; 3,5; 3,5 ekstra bred; 3,5 medium; 3,5 smal; 3,5 standard; 3,5 bred; 4; 4 ekstra bred; 4 medium; 4 smal; 4 standard; 4 bred; 4,5; 4,5 ekstra bred; 4,5 medium; 4,5 smal; 4,5 standard; 4,5 bred; 5; 5 ekstra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 ekstra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 ekstra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 ekstra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 ekstra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 ekstra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 ekstra bred; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standard; 8 bred; 8,5; 8,5 ekstra bred; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standard; 8,5 bred; 9; 9 ekstra bred; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standard; 9 bred; 9,5; 9,5 ekstra bred; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standard; 9,5 bred; Andet
it: Numero di scarpe per donne nel Regno Unito: 10; 10 extra largo; 10 medio; 10 stretto; 10 standard; 10 largo; 2; 2 extra largo; 2 medio; 2 stretto; 2 standard; 2 largo; 2,5; 2,5 extra largo; 2,5 medio; 2,5 stretto; 2,5 standard; 2,5 largo; 3; 3 extra largo; 3 medio; 3 stretto; 3 standard; 3 largo; 3,5; 3,5 extra largo; 3,5 medio; 3,5 stretto; 3,5 standard; 3,5 largo; 4; 4 extra largo; 4 medio; 4 stretto; 4 standard; 4 largo; 4,5; 4,5 extra largo; 4,5 medio; 4,5 stretto; 4,5 standard; 4,5 largo; 5; 5 extra largo; 5 medio; 5 stretto; 5 standard; 5 largo; 5,5; 5,5 extra largo; 5,5 medio; 5,5 stretto; 5,5 standard; 5,5 largo; 6; 6 extra largo; 6 medio; 6 stretto; 6 standard; 6 largo; 6,5; 6,5 extra largo; 6,5 medio; 6,5 stretto; 6,5 standard; 6,5 largo; 7; 7 extra largo; 7 medio; 7 stretto; 7 standard; 7 largo; 7,5; 7,5 extra largo; 7,5 medio; 7,5 stretto; 7,5 standard; 7,5 largo; 8; 8 extra largo; 8 medio; 8 stretto; 8 standard; 8 largo; 8,5; 8,5 extra largo; 8,5 medio; 8,5 stretto; 8,5 standard; 8,5 largo; 9; 9 extra largo; 9 medio; 9 stretto; 9 standard; 9 largo; 9,5; 9,5 extra largo; 9,5 medio; 9,5 stretto; 9,5 standard; 9,5 largo; Altro
lt-LT: JK moterų batų dydis: 10; 10 itin platus; 10 vidutinis; 10 siauras; 10 standartinis; 10 platus; 2; 2 itin platus; 2 vidutinis; 2 siauras; 2 standartinis; 2 platus; 2,5; 2,5 itin platus; 2,5 vidutinis; 2,5 siauras; 2,5 standartinis; 2,5 platus; 3; 3 itin platus; 3 vidutinis; 3 siauras; 3 standartinis; 3 platus; 3,5; 3,5 itin platus; 3,5 vidutinis; 3,5 siauras; 3,5 standartinis; 3,5 platus; 4; 4 itin platus; 4 vidutinis; 4 siauras; 4 standartinis; 4 platus; 4,5; 4,5 itin platus; 4,5 vidutinis; 4,5 siauras; 4,5 standartinis; 4,5 platus; 5; 5 itin platus; 5 vidutinis; 5 siauras; 5 standartinis; 5 platus; 5,5; 5,5 itin platus; 5,5 vidutinis; 5,5 siauras; 5,5 standartinis; 5,5 platus; 6; 6 itin platus; 6 vidutinis; 6 siauras; 6 standartinis; 6 platus; 6,5; 6,5 itin platus; 6,5 vidutinis; 6,5 siauras; 6,5 standartinis; 6,5 platus; 7; 7 itin platus; 7 vidutinis; 7 siauras; 7 standartinis; 7 platus; 7,5; 7,5 itin platus; 7,5 vidutinis; 7,5 siauras; 7,5 standartinis; 7,5 platus; 8; 8 itin platus; 8 vidutinis; 8 siauras; 8 standartinis; 8 platus; 8,5; 8,5 itin platus; 8,5 vidutinis; 8,5 siauras; 8,5 standartinis; 8,5 platus; 9; 9 itin platus; 9 vidutinis; 9 siauras; 9 standartinis; 9 platus; 9,5; 9,5 itin platus; 9,5 vidutinis; 9,5 siauras; 9,5 standartinis; 9,5 platus; Kita
en: UK women's shoe size: 10; 10 Extra Wide; 10 Medium; 10 Narrow; 10 Standard; 10 Wide; 2; 2 Extra Wide; 2 Medium; 2 Narrow; 2 Standard; 2 Wide; 2.5; 2.5 Extra Wide; 2.5 Medium; 2.5 Narrow; 2.5 Standard; 2.5 Wide; 3; 3 Extra Wide; 3 Medium; 3 Narrow; 3 Standard; 3 Wide; 3.5; 3.5 Extra Wide; 3.5 Medium; 3.5 Narrow; 3.5 Standard; 3.5 Wide; 4; 4 Extra Wide; 4 Medium; 4 Narrow; 4 Standard; 4 Wide; 4.5; 4.5 Extra Wide; 4.5 Medium; 4.5 Narrow; 4.5 Standard; 4.5 Wide; 5; 5 Extra Wide; 5 Medium; 5 Narrow; 5 Standard; 5 Wide; 5.5; 5.5 Extra Wide; 5.5 Medium; 5.5 Narrow; 5.5 Standard; 5.5 Wide; 6; 6 Extra Wide; 6 Medium; 6 Narrow; 6 Standard; 6 Wide; 6.5; 6.5 Extra Wide; 6.5 Medium; 6.5 Narrow; 6.5 Standard; 6.5 Wide; 7; 7 Extra Wide; 7 Medium; 7 Narrow; 7 Standard; 7 Wide; 7.5; 7.5 Extra Wide; 7.5 Medium; 7.5 Narrow; 7.5 Standard; 7.5 Wide; 8; 8 Extra Wide; 8 Medium; 8 Narrow; 8 Standard; 8 Wide; 8.5; 8.5 Extra Wide; 8.5 Medium; 8.5 Narrow; 8.5 Standard; 8.5 Wide; 9; 9 Extra Wide; 9 Medium; 9 Narrow; 9 Standard; 9 Wide; 9.5; 9.5 Extra Wide; 9.5 Medium; 9.5 Narrow; 9.5 Standard; 9.5 Wide; Other
zh-TW: 英國女鞋尺寸: 10; 10 特寬版; 10 中等; 10 窄版; 10 標準; 10 寬版; 2; 2 特寬版; 2 中等; 2 窄版; 2 標準; 2 寬版; 2.5; 2.5 特寬版; 2.5 中等; 2.5 窄版; 2.5 標準; 2.5 寬版; 3; 3 特寬版; 3 中等; 3 窄版; 3 標準; 3 寬版; 3.5; 3.5 特寬版; 3.5 中等; 3.5 窄版; 3.5 標準; 3.5 寬版; 4; 4 特寬版; 4 中等; 4 窄版; 4 標準; 4 寬版; 4.5; 4.5 特寬版; 4.5 中等; 4.5 窄版; 4.5 標準; 4.5 寬版; 5; 5 特寬版; 5 中等; 5 窄版; 5 標準; 5 寬版; 5.5; 5.5 特寬版; 5.5 中等; 5.5 窄版; 5.5 標準; 5.5 寬版; 6; 6 特寬版; 6 中等; 6 窄版; 6 標準; 6 寬版; 6.5; 6.5 特寬版; 6.5 中等; 6.5 窄版; 6.5 標準; 6.5 寬版; 7; 7 特寬版; 7 中等; 7 窄版; 7 標準; 7 寬版; 7.5; 7.5 特寬版; 7.5 中等; 7.5 窄版; 7.5 標準; 7.5 寬版; 8; 8 特寬版; 8 中等; 8 窄版; 8 標準; 8 寬版; 8.5; 8.5 特寬版; 8.5 中等; 8.5 窄版; 8.5 標準; 8.5 寬版; 9; 9 特寬版; 9 中等; 9 窄版; 9 標準; 9 寬版; 9.5; 9.5 特寬版; 9.5 中等; 9.5 窄版; 9.5 標準; 9.5 寬版; 其他
zh-CN: 英国女鞋码: 10; 10 特宽; 10 中等; 10 窄; 10 标准; 10 宽; 2; 2 特宽; 2 中等; 2 窄; 2 标准; 2 宽; 2.5; 2.5 特宽; 2.5 中等; 2.5 窄; 2.5 标准; 2.5 宽; 3; 3 特宽; 3 中等; 3 窄; 3 标准; 3 宽; 3.5; 3.5 特宽; 3.5 中等; 3.5 窄; 3.5 标准; 3.5 宽; 4; 4 特宽; 4 中等; 4 窄; 4 标准; 4 宽; 4.5; 4.5 特宽; 4.5 中等; 4.5 窄; 4.5 标准; 4.5 宽; 5; 5 特宽; 5 中等; 5 窄; 5 标准; 5 宽; 5.5; 5.5 特宽; 5.5 中等; 5.5 窄; 5.5 标准; 5.5 宽; 6; 6 特宽; 6 中等; 6 窄; 6 标准; 6 宽; 6.5; 6.5 特宽; 6.5 中等; 6.5 窄; 6.5 标准; 6.5 宽; 7; 7 特宽; 7 中等; 7 窄; 7 标准; 7 宽; 7.5; 7.5 特宽; 7.5 中等; 7.5 窄; 7.5 标准; 7.5 宽; 8; 8 特宽; 8 中等; 8 窄; 8 标准; 8 宽; 8.5; 8.5 特宽; 8.5 中等; 8.5 窄; 8.5 标准; 8.5 宽; 9; 9 特宽; 9 中等; 9 窄; 9 标准; 9 宽; 9.5; 9.5 特宽; 9.5 中等; 9.5 窄; 9.5 标准; 9.5 宽; 其他
cs: Velikost dámské obuvi UK: 10; 10 extra široké; 10 střední; 10 úzké; 10 standardní; 10 široké; 2; 2 extra široké; 2 střední; 2 úzké; 2 standardní; 2 široké; 2,5; 2,5 extra široké; 2,5 střední; 2,5 úzké; 2,5 standardní; 2,5 široké; 3; 3 extra široké; 3 střední; 3 úzké; 3 standardní; 3 široké; 3,5; 3,5 extra široké; 3,5 střední; 3,5 úzké; 3,5 standardní; 3,5 široké; 4; 4 extra široké; 4 střední; 4 úzké; 4 standardní; 4 široké; 4,5; 4,5 extra široké; 4,5 střední; 4,5 úzké; 4,5 standardní; 4,5 široké; 5; 5 extra široké; 5 střední; 5 úzké; 5 standardní; 5 široké; 5,5; 5,5 extra široké; 5,5 střední; 5,5 úzké; 5,5 standardní; 5,5 široké; 6; 6 extra široké; 6 střední; 6 úzké; 6 standardní; 6 široké; 6,5; 6,5 extra široké; 6,5 střední; 6,5 úzké; 6,5 standardní; 6,5 široké; 7; 7 extra široké; 7 střední; 7 úzké; 7 standardní; 7 široké; 7,5; 7,5 extra široké; 7,5 střední; 7,5 úzké; 7,5 standardní; 7,5 široké; 8; 8 extra široké; 8 střední; 8 úzké; 8 standardní; 8 široké; 8,5; 8,5 extra široké; 8,5 střední; 8,5 úzké; 8,5 standardní; 8,5 široké; 9; 9 extra široké; 9 střední; 9 úzké; 9 standardní; 9 široké; 9,5; 9,5 extra široké; 9,5 střední; 9,5 úzké; 9,5 standardní; 9,5 široké; Ostatní
nl: UK damesschoenmaat: 10; 10 Extra breed; 10 Medium; 10 Smal; 10 Standaard; 10 Breed; 2; 2 Extra breed; 2 Medium; 2 Smal; 2 Standaard; 2 Breed; 2,5; 2,5 Extra breed; 2,5 Medium; 2,5 Smal; 2,5 Standaard; 2,5 Breed; 3; 3 Extra breed; 3 Medium; 3 Smal; 3 Standaard; 3 Breed; 3,5; 3,5 Extra breed; 3,5 Medium; 3,5 Smal; 3,5 Standaard; 3,5 Breed; 4; 4 Extra breed; 4 Medium; 4 Smal; 4 Standaard; 4 Breed; 4,5; 4,5 Extra breed; 4,5 Medium; 4,5 Smal; 4,5 Standaard; 4,5 Breed; 5; 5 Extra breed; 5 Medium; 5 Smal; 5 Standaard; 5 Breed; 5,5; 5,5 Extra breed; 5,5 Medium; 5,5 Smal; 5,5 Standaard; 5,5 Breed; 6; 6 Extra breed; 6 Medium; 6 Smal; 6 Standaard; 6 Breed; 6,5; 6,5 Extra breed; 6,5 Medium; 6,5 Smal; 6,5 Standaard; 6,5 Breed; 7; 7 Extra breed; 7 Medium; 7 Smal; 7 Standaard; 7 Breed; 7,5; 7,5 Extra breed; 7,5 Medium; 7,5 Smal; 7,5 Standaard; 7,5 Breed; 8; 8 Extra breed; 8 Medium; 8 Smal; 8 Standaard; 8 Breed; 8,5; 8,5 Extra breed; 8,5 Medium; 8,5 Smal; 8,5 Standaard; 8,5 Breed; 9; 9 Extra breed; 9 Medium; 9 Smal; 9 Standaard; 9 Breed; 9,5; 9,5 Extra breed; 9,5 Medium; 9,5 Smal; 9,5 Standaard; 9,5 Breed; Anders
nb: Britisk skostørrelse for kvinner: 10; 10 ekstra bred; 10 medium; 10 smal; 10 standard; 10 bred; 2; 2 ekstra bred; 2 medium; 2 smal; 2 standard; 2 bred; 2,5; 2,5 ekstra bred; 2,5 medium; 2,5 smal; 2,5 standard; 2,5 bred; 3; 3 ekstra bred; 3 medium; 3 smal; 3 standard; 3 bred; 3,5; 3,5 ekstra bred; 3,5 medium; 3,5 smal; 3,5 standard; 3,5 bred; 4; 4 ekstra bred; 4 medium; 4 smal; 4 standard; 4 bred; 4,5; 4,5 ekstra bred; 4,5 medium; 4,5 smal; 4,5 standard; 4,5 bred; 5; 5 ekstra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 ekstra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 ekstra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 ekstra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 ekstra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 ekstra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 ekstra bred; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standard; 8 bred; 8,5; 8,5 ekstra bred; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standard; 8,5 bred; 9; 9 ekstra bred; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standard; 9 bred; 9,5; 9,5 ekstra bred; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standard; 9,5 bred; Annet
bg-BG: Размер на дамски обувки по британски стандарт (UK): 10; 10 много широк; 10 среден; 10 тесен; 10 стандартен; 10 широк; 2; 2 много широк; 2 среден; 2 тесен; 2 стандартен; 2 широк; 2,5; 2,5 много широк; 2,5 среден; 2,5 тесен; 2,5 стандартен; 2,5 широк; 3; 3 много широк; 3 среден; 3 тесен; 3 стандартен; 3 широк; 3,5; 3,5 много широк; 3,5 среден; 3,5 тесен; 3,5 стандартен; 3,5 широк; 4; 4 много широк; 4 среден; 4 тесен; 4 стандартен; 4 широк; 4,5; 4,5 много широк; 4,5 среден; 4,5 тесен; 4,5 стандартен; 4,5 широк; 5; 5 много широк; 5 среден; 5 тесен; 5 стандартен; 5 широк; 5,5; 5,5 много широк; 5,5 среден; 5,5 тесен; 5,5 стандартен; 5,5 широк; 6; 6 много широк; 6 среден; 6 тесен; 6 стандартен; 6 широк; 6,5; 6,5 много широк; 6,5 среден; 6,5 тесен; 6,5 стандартен; 6,5 широк; 7; 7 много широк; 7 среден; 7 тесен; 7 стандартен; 7 широк; 7,5; 7,5 много широк; 7,5 среден; 7,5 тесен; 7,5 стандартен; 7,5 широк; 8; 8 много широк; 8 среден; 8 тесен; 8 стандартен; 8 широк; 8,5; 8,5 много широк; 8,5 среден; 8,5 тесен; 8,5 стандартен; 8,5 широк; 9; 9 много широк; 9 среден; 9 тесен; 9 стандартен; 9 широк; 9,5; 9,5 много широк; 9,5 среден; 9,5 тесен; 9,5 стандартен; 9,5 широк; Друг
tr: Birleşik Krallık kadın ayakkabı numarası: 10; 10 ekstra geniş; 10 orta; 10 dar; 10 standart; 10 geniş; 2; 2 ekstra geniş; 2 orta; 2 dar; 2 standart; 2 geniş; 2,5; 2,5 ekstra geniş; 2,5 orta; 2,5 dar; 2,5 standart; 2,5 geniş; 3; 3 ekstra geniş; 3 orta; 3 dar; 3 standart; 3 geniş; 3,5; 3,5 ekstra geniş; 3,5 orta; 3,5 dar; 3,5 standart; 3,5 geniş; 4; 4 ekstra geniş; 4 orta; 4 dar; 4 standart; 4 geniş; 4,5; 4,5 ekstra geniş; 4,5 orta; 4,5 dar; 4,5 standart; 4,5 geniş; 5; 5 ekstra geniş; 5 orta; 5 dar; 5 standart; 5 geniş; 5,5; 5,5 ekstra geniş; 5,5 orta; 5,5 dar; 5,5 standart; 5,5 geniş; 6; 6 ekstra geniş; 6 orta; 6 dar; 6 standart; 6 geniş; 6,5; 6,5 ekstra geniş; 6,5 orta; 6,5 dar; 6,5 standart; 6,5 geniş; 7; 7 ekstra geniş; 7 orta; 7 dar; 7 standart; 7 geniş; 7,5; 7,5 ekstra geniş; 7,5 orta; 7,5 dar; 7,5 standart; 7,5 geniş; 8; 8 ekstra geniş; 8 orta; 8 dar; 8 standart; 8 geniş; 8,5; 8,5 ekstra geniş; 8,5 orta; 8,5 dar; 8,5 standart; 8,5 geniş; 9; 9 ekstra geniş; 9 orta; 9 dar; 9 standart; 9 geniş; 9,5; 9,5 ekstra geniş; 9,5 orta; 9,5 dar; 9,5 standart; 9,5 geniş; Diğer
fr: Pointure UK pour femme: 10; 10 Extra large; 10 Moyen; 10 Étroit; 10 Standard; 10 Large; 2; 2 Extra large; 2 Moyen; 2 Étroit; 2 Standard; 2 Large; 2,5; 2,5 Extra large; 2,5 Moyen; 2,5 Étroit; 2,5 Standard; 2,5 Large; 3; 3 Extra large; 3 Moyen; 3 Étroit; 3 Standard; 3 Large; 3,5; 3,5 Extra large; 3,5 Moyen; 3,5 Étroit; 3,5 Standard; 3,5 Large; 4; 4 Extra large; 4 Moyen; 4 Étroit; 4 Standard; 4 Large; 4,5; 4,5 Extra large; 4,5 Moyen; 4,5 Étroit; 4,5 Standard; 4,5 Large; 5; 5 Extra large; 5 Moyen; 5 Étroit; 5 Standard; 5 Large; 5,5; 5,5 Extra large; 5,5 Moyen; 5,5 Étroit; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Large; 6; 6 Extra large; 6 Moyen; 6 Étroit; 6 Standard; 6 Large; 6,5; 6,5 Extra large; 6,5 Moyen; 6,5 Étroit; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Large; 7; 7 Extra large; 7 Moyen; 7 Étroit; 7 Standard; 7 Large; 7,5; 7,5 Extra large; 7,5 Moyen; 7,5 Étroit; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Large; 8; 8 Extra large; 8 Moyen; 8 Étroit; 8 Standard; 8 Large; 8,5; 8,5 Extra large; 8,5 Moyen; 8,5 Étroit; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Large; 9; 9 Extra large; 9 Moyen; 9 Étroit; 9 Standard; 9 Large; 9,5; 9,5 Extra large; 9,5 Moyen; 9,5 Étroit; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Large; Autre
sl-SI: Britanska velikost ženskih čevljev: 10; 10 zelo široki; 10 srednji; 10 ozki; 10 standardni; 10 široki; 2; 2 zelo široki; 2 srednji; 2 ozki; 2 standardni; 2 široki; 2,5; 2,5 zelo široki; 2,5 srednji; 2,5 ozki; 2,5 standardni; 2,5 široki; 3; 3 zelo široki; 3 srednji; 3 ozki; 3 standardni; 3 široki; 3,5; 3,5 zelo široki; 3,5 srednji; 3,5 ozki; 3,5 standardni; 3,5 široki; 4; 4 zelo široki; 4 srednji; 4 ozki; 4 standardni; 4 široki; 4,5; 4,5 zelo široki; 4,5 srednji; 4,5 ozki; 4,5 standardni; 4,5 široki; 5; 5 zelo široki; 5 srednji; 5 ozki; 5 standardni; 5 široki; 5,5; 5,5 zelo široki; 5,5 srednji; 5,5 ozki; 5,5 standardni; 5,5 široki; 6; 6 zelo široki; 6 srednji; 6 ozki; 6 standardni; 6 široki; 6,5; 6,5 zelo široki; 6,5 srednji; 6,5 ozki; 6,5 standardni; 6,5 široki; 7; 7 zelo široki; 7 srednji; 7 ozki; 7 standardni; 7 široki; 7,5; 7,5 zelo široki; 7,5 srednji; 7,5 ozki; 7,5 standardni; 7,5 široki; 8; 8 zelo široki; 8 srednji; 8 ozki; 8 standardni; 8 široki; 8,5; 8,5 zelo široki; 8,5 srednji; 8,5 ozki; 8,5 standardni; 8,5 široki; 9; 9 zelo široki; 9 srednji; 9 ozki; 9 standardni; 9 široki; 9,5; 9,5 zelo široki; 9,5 srednji; 9,5 ozki; 9,5 standardni; 9,5 široki; Drugo
ja: UK女性用靴の寸法: 10; 10 エクストラワイド; 10 ミディアム; 10 ナロー; 10 スタンダード; 10 ワイド; 2; 2 エクストラワイド; 2 ミディアム; 2 ナロー; 2 スタンダード; 2 ワイド; 2.5; 2.5 エクストラワイド; 2.5 ミディアム; 2.5 ナロー; 2.5 スタンダード; 2.5 ワイド; 3; 3 エクストラワイド; 3 ミディアム; 3 ナロー; 3 スタンダード; 3 ワイド; 3.5; 3.5 エクストラワイド; 3.5 ミディアム; 3.5 ナロー; 3.5 スタンダード; 3.5 ワイド; 4; 4 エクストラワイド; 4 ミディアム; 4 ナロー; 4 スタンダード; 4 ワイド; 4.5; 4.5 エクストラワイド; 4.5 ミディアム; 4.5 ナロー; 4.5 スタンダード; 4.5 ワイド; 5; 5 エクストラワイド; 5 ミディアム; 5 ナロー; 5 スタンダード; 5 ワイド; 5.5; 5.5 エクストラワイド; 5.5 ミディアム; 5.5 ナロー; 5.5 スタンダード; 5.5 ワイド; 6; 6 エクストラワイド; 6 ミディアム; 6 ナロー; 6 スタンダード; 6 ワイド; 6.5; 6.5 エクストラワイド; 6.5 ミディアム; 6.5 ナロー; 6.5 スタンダード; 6.5 ワイド; 7; 7 エクストラワイド; 7 ミディアム; 7 ナロー; 7 スタンダード; 7 ワイド; 7.5; 7.5 エクストラワイド; 7.5 ミディアム; 7.5 ナロー; 7.5 スタンダード; 7.5 ワイド; 8; 8 エクストラワイド; 8 ミディアム; 8 ナロー; 8 スタンダード; 8 ワイド; 8.5; 8.5 エクストラワイド; 8.5 ミディアム; 8.5 ナロー; 8.5 スタンダード; 8.5 ワイド; 9; 9 エクストラワイド; 9 ミディアム; 9 ナロー; 9 スタンダード; 9 ワイド; 9.5; 9.5 エクストラワイド; 9.5 ミディアム; 9.5 ナロー; 9.5 スタンダード; 9.5 ワイド; その他
ko: 영국 여성 신발 사이즈: 10; 10 엑스트라 와이드; 10 미디엄; 10 내로우; 10 스탠다드; 10 와이드; 2; 2 엑스트라 와이드; 2 미디엄; 2 내로우; 2 스탠다드; 2 와이드; 2.5; 2.5 엑스트라 와이드; 2.5 미디엄; 2.5 내로우; 2.5 스탠다드; 2.5 와이드; 3; 3 엑스트라 와이드; 3 미디엄; 3 내로우; 3 스탠다드; 3 와이드; 3.5; 3.5 엑스트라 와이드; 3.5 미디엄; 3.5 내로우; 3.5 스탠다드; 3.5 와이드; 4; 4 엑스트라 와이드; 4 미디엄; 4 내로우; 4 스탠다드; 4 와이드; 4.5; 4.5 엑스트라 와이드; 4.5 미디엄; 4.5 내로우; 4.5 스탠다드; 4.5 와이드; 5; 5 엑스트라 와이드; 5 미디엄; 5 내로우; 5 스탠다드; 5 와이드; 5.5; 5.5 엑스트라 와이드; 5.5 미디엄; 5.5 내로우; 5.5 스탠다드; 5.5 와이드; 6; 6 엑스트라 와이드; 6 미디엄; 6 내로우; 6 스탠다드; 6 와이드; 6.5; 6.5 엑스트라 와이드; 6.5 미디엄; 6.5 내로우; 6.5 스탠다드; 6.5 와이드; 7; 7 엑스트라 와이드; 7 미디엄; 7 내로우; 7 스탠다드; 7 와이드; 7.5; 7.5 엑스트라 와이드; 7.5 미디엄; 7.5 내로우; 7.5 스탠다드; 7.5 와이드; 8; 8 엑스트라 와이드; 8 미디엄; 8 내로우; 8 스탠다드; 8 와이드; 8.5; 8.5 엑스트라 와이드; 8.5 미디엄; 8.5 내로우; 8.5 스탠다드; 8.5 와이드; 9; 9 엑스트라 와이드; 9 미디엄; 9 내로우; 9 스탠다드; 9 와이드; 9.5; 9.5 엑스트라 와이드; 9.5 미디엄; 9.5 내로우; 9.5 스탠다드; 9.5 와이드; 기타